District of Columbia statutes.
1-521.07

Agency affirmative action plan; number of hires, promotions and terminations during period of plan.

The plan shall further state the number of hires, promotions, and terminations (due to retirement, death, reductions in service or force, lack of performance, disciplinary action, and all other reasons), and indicate the permanent, temporary, or probationary status of the terminated employees of, and personnel grievance and equal employment complaints instituted by, persons known to be members of the various classes specified in § 1-521.05, during the period since the previously submitted plan.

History

May 6, 1976, D.C. Law 1-63, § 8, 22 DCR 6540

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-513.
1973 Ed., § 1-320g.